Utah statutes.
34-30-8.   Forty-hour work week -- Overtime at one and one-half regular rate.

Forty hours shall constitute a working week on all works and undertakings carried on by the state, county, or municipal governments, or by any officer of the state or of any county or municipal government. Any persons, corporation, firm, contractor, agent, manager, or foreman, who shall require or contract with any person to work upon such works or undertakings longer than 40 hours in one week shall pay such employees at a rate not less than one and one-half times the regular rate at which he is employed.

